Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 7
REVIEW OF PLACEMENT

Law reviews.
For article, "Achieving Safe, Permanent Homes for

C
olorado

C
hildren", see 31 Colo. Law. 37 (Oct. 2002).

19-3-701. Petition for review of need for placement. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 791, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 91:
(1) amended, p. 1159, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 92:
(2) amended, p. 225, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 93:
(1) amended, p. 1637, § 24, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1139, § 75, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:
(2)(c) and (6) amended, p. 2686, § 206, effective July 1.

L. 96:
(6) amended, p. 1247, § 117, effective August 7.

L. 97:
(6) amended, p. 1441, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 99:
(2)(c) and (6) amended, p. 912, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2007:
Entire section repealed, p. 1509, § 5, effective May 31.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 2007 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 351, Session Laws of Colorado 2007.

19-3-702. Permanency hearing.

In order to provide stable, permanent homes for every child or youth placed out of the home, in as short a time as possible, a court shall conduct a permanency planning hearing. The court shall hold the permanency planning hearing as soon as possible
following the initial hearing held pursuant to a proceeding pursuant to part 3 of article 7 of this title 19 or the initial dispositional hearing pursuant to this article 3; except that the permanency planning hearing must
be held no later than ninety-one days after the initial decree of disposition. After the initial permanency planning hearing, the court shall hold additional hearings at least every six months while the case remains open
or more often in the discretion of the court, or upon the motion of any party. When possible, the permanency planning hearing must be combined with the in-person six-month review as provided for in section 19-1-115 (4)(c),
subsection (6)(a) of this section, or section 19-7-312. The court shall hold all permanency planning hearings in person, provide proper notice to all parties, and provide all parties the opportunity to be heard. The court
shall consult with the child or youth in a developmentally appropriate manner regarding the child's or youth's permanency goal.

If the court finds that reasonable efforts to reunify the child or youth and the parent are not required pursuant to section 19-1-115 (7) or if there is a finding that no appropriate treatment plan can be devised pursuant to section 19-3-508 (1)(d)(I),
the court shall hold a permanency planning hearing within thirty days after the finding. If the court finds that reasonable efforts to reunify the child or youth and the parent are not required and a motion for termination
has been filed pursuant to section 19-3-602, the permanency planning hearing and the hearing on the motion for termination may be combined, and the court shall make all determinations required at both hearings in the combined
hearing.

When the court schedules a permanency planning hearing pursuant to this section, the court or designee of the court shall promptly issue a notice stating the purpose of the hearing. The notice must set forth the constitutional and statutory rights of
the child's or youth's parents or guardian and the statutory rights of the child or youth. The notice of the hearing must comply with the requirements stated in section 19-3-502 (7) and must be sent to parents or guardians,
placement providers, and named children or youth.

The county department of human or social services shall propose a permanency plan for each child or youth, which plan must be completed and submitted to the court in the family services plan no later than five days in advance of the permanency planning
hearing.

At any permanency planning hearing, the court shall first determine if the child or youth should be returned to the child's or youth's parent, named guardian, or legal custodian and, if applicable, the date on which the child or youth must be returned.
If the child or youth cannot be returned home, the court shall also determine whether reasonable efforts have been made to find a safe and stable permanent home for the child or youth. The court shall not delay permanency planning
by considering the placement of children or youth together as a sibling group. At any permanency planning hearing, the court shall make the following determinations, when applicable:

Whether procedural safeguards to preserve parental rights have been applied in connection with any change in the child's or youth's placement or any determination affecting parental visitation of the child or youth;

Whether reasonable efforts have been made to finalize the permanency goal;

Whether ongoing efforts have been made to identify kin and relatives that are available to be a permanent placement for the child or youth;

When the child or youth resides in a placement out of state, whether the out-of-state placement continues to be appropriate and in the best interests of the child or youth;

Whether a child or youth who is fourteen years of age or older is receiving transition services to successful adulthood, regardless of his or her permanency goal; and

Whether the current placement of the child or youth could be a permanent placement, if necessary.

If the child or youth cannot be returned to the physical custody of the child's or youth's parent or legal guardian on the date of the hearing, the court shall enter one or more of the following permanency goals, of which subsections (4)(a)(I) to (4)(a)(V)
of this section may be adopted as concurrent goals pursuant to section 19-3-508 (7):

Return home;

Adoption with a relative;

Permanent placement with a relative through legal guardianship or allocation of parental responsibilities;

Adoption with a nonrelative;

Permanent placement with a nonrelative through legal guardianship or allocation of parental responsibilities;

Other planned permanent living arrangements either through emancipation or long-term foster care.

Other planned permanent living arrangements may only be used as a permanency goal for children or youth in exceptional circumstances for children sixteen years of age or older who have co-occurring complex conditions that preclude their return home, their
adoption or legal guardianship, or allocation of parental responsibilities; or for children and youth who are in the unaccompanied refugee minor program, regardless of their age.

Other planned permanent living arrangements may not be used as a concurrent goal.

The court shall ask the child or youth about his or her desired permanency outcome when considering other planned permanent living arrangements.

The department shall document in the family services plan the compelling reasons why it is not in the best interest of the child or youth to return home, be placed for adoption, be placed with a legal guardian, or be placed with a fit and willing relative.
In addition, the department shall document intensive, ongoing, and unsuccessful efforts made to return the child or youth home or to a secure placement with a fit and willing relative, including adult siblings;
a legal guardian; or an adoptive parent, including efforts that utilize search technology that includes social media to find biological family members for the children or youth.

The department shall document in the family services plan and the court shall review whether the child's or youth's placement is following the reasonable and prudent parent standard and whether the child or youth has regular, ongoing opportunities to
engage in age-appropriate activities.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(c) is effective until January 9, 2023.] Prior to closing a case before a youth's eighteenth birthday, the court or the youth's guardian ad litem shall notify the youth that the youth will lose the right to
receive medicaid until the maximum age provided by federal law if the case is closed prior to the youth's eighteenth birthday. Prior to closing a case after a youth's sixteenth birthday, the court shall advise the youth
of the youth's eligibility for the foster youth in transition program, created in section 19-7-303, should the youth later determine he or she needs child welfare assistance from a county department.

(c)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(c) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
Prior to closing a case before a youth's eighteenth birthday, the court or the youth's guardian ad litem or counsel for youth shall notify the youth that the youth will lose the right to receive medicaid
until the maximum age provided by federal law if the case is closed prior to the youth's eighteenth birthday. Prior to closing a case after a youth's sixteenth birthday, the court shall advise the youth of the youth's
eligibility for the foster youth in transition program, created in section 19-7-303, should the youth later determine the youth needs child welfare assistance from a county department.

Every child who is eighteen years of age or older who is leaving foster or kinship care must be provided with his or her birth certificate, social security card, health insurance information, medical records, either a driver's license or state-issued
identification card, and proof of foster care.

If the court finds that there is not a substantial probability that the child or youth will be returned to a parent or legal guardian within six months and the child or youth appears to be adoptable and meets the criteria for adoption in section 19-5-203,
the court may order the county department of human or social services to show cause why it should not file a motion to terminate the parent-child legal relationship pursuant to part 6 of this article 3. Cause may include,
but is not limited to, any of the following conditions:

The parent or legal guardian has maintained regular parenting time and contact with the child or youth, and the child or youth would benefit from continuing this relationship;

A child who is twelve years of age or older objects to termination of the parent-child legal relationship;

The child's foster parents are unable to adopt the child because of exceptional circumstances that do not include an unwillingness to accept legal responsibility for the child. The foster parents must be willing and capable of providing the child with
a stable and permanent environment, and it must be shown that removal of the child from the physical custody of his or her foster parents would be seriously detrimental to the emotional well-being of the child;
or

The criteria for termination in section 19-3-604 have not yet been met.

For a child or youth in a case designated pursuant to section 19-1-123 only:

A permanent home is the place in which the child or youth may reside if the child or youth is unable to return home to a parent or legal guardian. If the court determines by a preponderance of the evidence that a permanent home is not currently available
or that the child's or youth's current needs or situation prohibit placement, the court must be shown and the court must find that reasonable efforts, as defined in section 19-1-103, were made to find the child or youth
an appropriate permanent home and such a home is not currently available or that a child's or youth's needs or situation prohibit the child or youth from a successful placement in a permanent home.

Regardless of any permanent home findings made pursuant to this section, reasonable efforts shall continue to be made to return the child or youth home unless the court has previously found or finds that reunification is not an option pursuant to section
19-1-115 (7). Any findings by the court regarding a permanent home shall not delay or interfere with reunification of a child or youth with a parent or legal guardian.

At a permanency planning hearing that occurs immediately prior to twelve months after the original placement of the child or youth out of the home, the court shall make a finding identifying whether the child or youth is in a placement that can provide
legal permanency. The court must make this finding to ensure that a child or youth who has been removed from his or her home is placed in a permanent home as expeditiously as possible.

The court shall review the case at a permanency planning hearing at least every six months until the court finds that the child or youth is in a permanent home. The permanency planning hearings must continue as long as the court is unable to find that
the child or youth is in a permanent home. At each hearing, the court must be provided evidence that a child or youth is in a permanent home or that reasonable efforts, as defined in section 19-1-103, continue to be made
to find the child or youth an appropriate permanent home and such a home is not currently available or that a child's or youth's needs or situation prohibit the child or youth from successful placement in a permanent home.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (5)(e) is effective until January 9, 2023.] At each permanency planning hearing, the caseworker and the child's or youth's guardian ad litem shall provide the court with a written or verbal report specifying
what efforts have been made to identify a permanent home for the child or youth and what services have been provided to the child or youth to facilitate identification of a permanent home.

(e)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (5)(e) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
At each permanency planning hearing, the caseworker shall provide the court with a written or verbal report specifying what efforts have been made to identify a permanent home for the child and what services
have been provided to the child to facilitate identification of a permanent home.

In determining whether a child or youth is in a permanent home, the court shall consider placement of the children or youth together as a sibling group pursuant to section 19-3-213.

[Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (6) is effective until January 9, 2023.] If a placement change is contested by a named party or child or youth and the child or youth is not reunifying with a parent or legal guardian,
the court shall consider all pertinent information, including the child's or youth's wishes, related to modifying the placement of the child or youth prior to removing the child or youth from his or her placement, and including
the following:

(6)

[

Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (6) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
If a placement change is contested by a party and the child or youth is not reunifying with a parent or legal guardian, the court shall consider all pertinent information, including the child's or youth's wishes,
related to modifying the placement of the child or youth prior to removing the child or youth from the child's or youth's placement, and including the following:

An individualized assessment of the child's or youth's needs created pursuant to Title IV-E of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, and regulations promulgated thereunder, as amended;

Whether the child's or youth's placement at the time of the hearing is a safe and potentially permanent home for the child or youth;

The child's or youth's actual age and developmental stage and, in consideration of this information, the child's or youth's attachment needs;

Whether the child or youth has significant psychological ties to a person who could provide a permanent home for the child or youth, including a relative, and, if so, whether this person maintained contact with the child or youth during the child's or
youth's placement out of the home;

Whether a person who could provide a permanent home for the child or youth is willing to maintain appropriate contact after an adoption of the child or youth with the child's or youth's relatives, particularly sibling relatives, when such contact is safe,
reasonable, and appropriate;

Whether a person who could provide a permanent home for the child or youth is aware of the child's or youth's culture and is willing to provide the child or youth with positive ties to his or her culture;

The child's or youth's medical, physical, emotional, or other specific needs, and whether a person who could provide a permanent placement for the child or youth is able to meet the child's or youth's needs; and

The child's or youth's attachment to the child's or youth's caregiver at the time of the hearing and the possible effects on the child's or youth's emotional well-being if the child or youth is removed from the caregiver's home.

Source:

L. 89:
Entire section added, p. 930, § 2, effective April 23.

L. 92:
(1), (2), (4), (6), and (8) amended, p. 225, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 93:
(1), (2), (4), (6), and (7) amended, p. 390, § 4, effective April 19; (5)(a)(I) amended, p. 582, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 94:
(1) and (3) amended and (2.5) added, p. 2057, § 9, effective July 1; (6) and (8) amended, p. 2687, § 207, effective July 1.

L. 98:
(1), (3), (4), and (6) amended, p. 1421, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 99:
(1), (2), (2.5), (3), (6), and (8) amended, p. 913, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2000:
(2.7) added, p. 476, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2001:
Entire section amended, p. 847, § 11, effective June 1.

L. 2003:
(1), (6)(a), (6)(b), and (8)(b) amended and (6.5) added, p. 2487, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2005:
(9) added, p. 679, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2007:
(1) and (1.5) amended and (3.7) added, p. 1018, § 9, effective May 22.

L. 2008:
(10) added, p. 1533, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2015:
(9) amended, (HB 15-1337), ch. 328, p. 1342, § 3, effective June 5.

L. 2018:
(2), IP(2.5), and IP(5)(a) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 423, § 63, effective August 8.

L. 2019:
Entire section R&RE, (HB 19-1219), ch. 237, p. 2349, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2021:
(1)(a) and (4)(c) amended, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2217, § 6, effective June 25; (5)(a) and (5)(d) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 733, § 81, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(4)(c), (5)(e), and IP(6) amended, (HB 22-1038), ch. 92, p. 437, § 14, effective January 9, 2023.

Cross references:
(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending subsection (5)(a)(I), see section 1 of chapter 165, Session Laws of Colorado 1993. For the legislative declaration contained in the 1999 act amending
subsections (1), (2), (2.5), (3), (6), and (8), see section 1 of chapter 233, Session Laws of Colorado 1999. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2001 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 241, Session Laws
of Colorado 2001. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2005 act enacting subsection (9), see section 1 of chapter 194, Session Laws of Colorado 2005. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter
38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1038, see section 1 of chapter 92, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

(2) For Title IV-E of the federal "Social Security Act", see 42 U.S.C. § 670 et seq.

19-3-702.5. Periodic reviews.

The court shall conduct a periodic review at least every six months and, at the periodic review, shall determine the following:

Whether the child's or youth's safety is protected in the placement;

Whether reasonable efforts have been made to find safe and permanent placement for the child or youth;

The continuing necessity for and the appropriateness of the child's or youth's placement;

The extent of compliance with the individual case plan pursuant to section 19-3-209, and the extent of progress that has been made toward alleviating or mitigating the causes necessitating placement out of the home;

A likely time frame in which the child or youth will be returned to a parent or legal guardian or be in a safe and permanent home; and

If the child or youth is not likely to be returned to a parent or legal guardian within six months, a finding about whether the child or youth is in a potential permanent placement and if not, a likely time frame when he or she will be in a safe and permanent
home.

Source:

L. 2019:
Entire section added, (HB 19-1219), ch. 237, p. 2354, § 2, effective August 2.

19-3-703. Permanent home. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:
Entire section added, p. 2058, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 98:
Entire section amended, p. 822, § 28, effective August 5.

L. 2001:
Entire section amended, p. 851, § 12, effective June 1.

L. 2019:
Entire section repealed, (HB 19-1219), ch. 237, p. 2355, § 3, effective August 2.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 2001 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 241, Session Laws of Colorado 2001.

19-3-704. Youth with disabilities - incapacitated persons.

A party may request the court to determine whether a youth is an incapacitated person, as defined in section 15-14-102. The motion must be filed with the court prior to the youth's eighteenth birthday.

If there has been a determination, or if a determination is pending, that a youth is an incapacitated person, as defined in section 15-14-102, then jurisdiction continues as provided in section 19-3-205.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire section added, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2217, § 7, effective June 25.

19-3-705. Transition hearing.

When a youth turns eighteen years of age while the youth is a named child or is a youth in a dependency and neglect case open through this article 3, the court shall hold a transition hearing within thirty-five days after the youth's eighteenth birthday.
The purpose of the transition hearing is to determine whether the youth will opt into the foster youth in transition program, established in section 19-7-303, or, alternatively, choose to emancipate.

At least seven days prior to a transition hearing, a county department shall file a report with the court that includes:

A description of the county department's reasonable efforts toward achieving the youth's permanency goals and a successful transition to adulthood;

An affirmation that the county department has provided the youth with all necessary records and documents, including copies of all documents listed in section 19-3-702 (4)(d), health records, education records, and written information concerning the youth's
family history and contact information for siblings, if available and appropriate;

An affirmation that the county department has informed the youth, in a developmentally appropriate manner, of the benefits and options available to the youth by participating in the foster youth in transition program created in section 19-7-303 and the
voluntary nature of that program; and

A statement of whether the youth has made a preliminary decision whether to emancipate or to enter the foster youth in transition program created in section 19-7-303 and either or both of the following:

If it is anticipated that the youth will choose to emancipate, the report must include a copy of the youth's emancipation transition plan executed pursuant to section 19-7-310, finalized no more than ninety days prior to the youth's transition; or

If it is anticipated that the youth will choose to enter the foster youth in transition program created in section 19-7-303, the county department shall file a petition pursuant to section 19-7-307.

The court shall advise the youth that:

Except as provided in section 19-3-704, the youth has the right to choose whether to emancipate or to voluntarily continue receiving services through the foster youth in transition program created in section 19-7-303;

To participate in the foster youth in transition program created in section 19-7-303, the youth must enter into a voluntary services agreement with the county department. The transition program provides the youth with access to financial support with
housing and other services, as outlined in section 19-7-305.

Services provided through the foster youth in transition program created in section 19-7-303 are voluntary for the youth, and the youth may remain in the transition program until the last day of the month in which the youth turns twenty-one years of age,
or such greater age of foster care eligibility as required by federal law, so long as the youth meets all other program eligibility requirements pursuant to section 19-7-304;

If the youth chooses to emancipate but later decides support is needed, the youth has the right to begin receiving child welfare services again through the foster youth in transition program, created in section 19-7-303, until the youth's twenty-first
birthday or such greater age of foster care eligibility as required by federal law; and

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(e) is effective until January 9, 2023.] The youth has the right to counsel who will represent the youth's objectives, beginning on the youth's eighteenth birthday. The youth has the right to choose whether
to have the youth's current guardian ad litem reappointed as counsel or to have a different individual appointed as counsel pursuant to section 19-3-203. The youth has the right to consult with the youth's counsel about
the decision whether to emancipate. The court shall advise the youth that the current emancipation transition hearing may be continued for up to one hundred nineteen days if the youth would like additional time to make
a decision or to prepare for emancipation. The court shall ask the youth whether the youth has had sufficient opportunity to consult with counsel and if the youth is ready to make a decision at the current time or, alternatively,
if the youth would like to request a continuance of up to one hundred nineteen days.

(e)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(e) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
The youth has the right to counsel, who shall represent the youth throughout the youth's participation in the foster youth transition program. The court shall advise the youth that the current emancipation
transition hearing may be continued for up to one hundred nineteen days if the youth would like additional time to make a decision or to prepare for emancipation. The court shall ask the youth whether the youth has
had sufficient opportunity to consult with counsel and if the youth is ready to make a decision at the current time or, alternatively, if the youth would like to request a continuance of up to one hundred nineteen days.

Prior to a youth emancipating, the court shall:

Review the youth's emancipation transition plan executed pursuant to section 19-7-310 and consult with the youth on readiness for emancipation;

Determine whether the county department has made reasonable efforts toward the youth's permanency goal and a successful transition to adulthood;

Determine whether the youth has been provided with all necessary records and documents described in subsection (2)(b) of this section; and

Determine whether the youth has been enrolled in medicaid and advise the youth on the youth's eligibility for former foster care medicaid up to twenty-six years of age pursuant to section 26-5-113 and of the necessity of keeping the youth's contact information
up to date.

With the youth's consent, the court may continue the emancipation transition hearing for up to one hundred nineteen days to allow time to improve the youth's emancipation transition plan, gather necessary documents and records, or for any other reason
necessary to allow the youth a successful transition to adulthood.

If a youth is opting into the foster youth in transition program created in section 19-7-303 and a petition has been filed pursuant to section 19-7-307, the court shall dismiss the case pursuant to this article 3 or dismiss the youth from the case brought
pursuant to this article 3, leave the case open for remaining siblings, and open a new case brought pursuant to part 3 of article 7 of this title 19. Such an action must not result in an interruption in case management services,
housing, medicaid coverage, or in foster care maintenance payments.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire section added, (HB 21-1094), ch. 340, p. 2217, § 7, effective June 25.

L. 2022:
(1) and (5) amended, (HB 22-1245), ch. 88, p. 418, § 5, effective August 10; (3)(e) amended, (HB 22-1038), ch. 92, p. 442, § 27, effective January 9, 2023.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1038, see section 1 of chapter 92, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.